Washington statutes.
RCW 39.53.100

Use of deposit moneys and investments in computing indebtedness.

In computing indebtedness for the purpose of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation there shall be deducted from the amount of outstanding indebtedness the amounts of money and investments credited to or on deposit for general obligation bond retirement.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 25 s 6; 1965 ex.s. c 138 s 11.]